Indiana, session 2026, HB1310.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-27.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 27.8. Domestic Violence Lethality Assessments
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "domestic violence incident"
means:
(1) domestic battery (as defined in IC 35-42-2-1.3);
(2) a crime of domestic violence (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-78); or
(3) another incident where a person has injured or has
threatened to injure a family or household member.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement agency" has
the meaning set forth in IC 5-2-17-2.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement officer" has
the meaning set forth in IC 5-2-1-2.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "lethality assessment" means an
assessment that:
2026 IN 1310—LS 6959/DI 151


(1) evaluates the likelihood of serious bodily injury or death;
and
(2) has been approved by the Domestic Violence Resource for
Increasing Safety and Connection.
Sec. 5. When a law enforcement officer:
(1) responds to a domestic violence incident; or
(2) has probable cause to believe a domestic violence incident
has occurred;
the law enforcement officer shall administer a lethality assessment
to an apparent victim.
Sec. 6. (a) The law enforcement officer shall:
(1) file the lethality assessment with the law enforcement
agency; and
(2) if necessary, immediately connect the apparent victim to
victim advocacy services.
(b) Upon receipt of the lethality assessment, the law enforcement
agency shall report the information to the following:
(1) The jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency.
(2) A local domestic violence fatality review team established
under IC 12-18-8-5.
(3) The statewide domestic violence fatality review committee
established under IC 12-18-9-3.
Sec. 7. All statements communicated in a lethality assessment
are:
(1) not admissible as evidence against the victim in any
judicial proceeding; and
(2) not discoverable in any litigation.
SECTION 2. IC 12-18-8-14 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. The coalition shall
collect and document information surrounding the deaths reviewed by
a local domestic violence fatality review team and domestic violence
lethality assessments. The coalition shall develop a data collection
form that includes the following:
(1) Identifying and nonidentifying information.
(2) Information regarding the circumstances surrounding a death.
(3) Factors contributing to a death.
(4) Findings and recommendations.
SECTION 3. IC 12-18-9-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.258-2017,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The statewide domestic violence fatality review
committee shall do the following:
(1) Compile and analyze data recorded by local domestic violence
2026 IN 1310—LS 6959/DI 151


fatality review teams in reviewing domestic violence fatalities.
(2) Review mortality records and examine all other records
relevant to domestic violence fatalities in Indiana.
(3) Assist efforts by local domestic violence fatality review teams
by:
(A) overseeing the creation of standardized forms and
protocols necessary for the review of domestic violence
deaths;
(B) providing expertise by answering questions related to a
domestic violence death that a local domestic violence fatality
review team is reviewing;
(C) establishing and sponsoring training programs for
members of local domestic violence fatality review teams; and
(D) providing, upon request of a local domestic violence
fatality review team, expertise in creating local prevention
strategies.
(4) Upon request by a local domestic violence fatality review
team, assist in or conduct a review of the death or near fatality of
a possible domestic violence victim as provided under section 7
of this chapter.
(5) In the absence of a county or regional domestic violence
fatality review team established under IC 12-18-8, conduct a
review of the death or near fatality of a possible domestic violence
victim as provided under section 7 of this chapter.
(6) Create strategies and make recommendations for the
prevention of serious injuries or deaths from domestic violence.
(7) Collect and analyze data concerning domestic violence
lethality assessments.
SECTION 4. IC 35-33-1-1.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) A law
enforcement officer responding to the scene of an alleged crime
involving domestic or family violence shall use all reasonable means
to prevent further violence, including the following:
(1) Transporting or obtaining transportation for the alleged victim
and each child to a designated safe place to meet with a domestic
violence counselor, local family member, or friend.
(2) Assisting the alleged victim in removing toiletries,
medication, and necessary clothing.
(3) Giving the alleged victim immediate and written notice of the
rights under IC 35-40.
(4) Administering a lethality assessment under IC 5-2-27.8.
(b) A law enforcement officer may confiscate and remove a firearm,
2026 IN 1310—LS 6959/DI 151


ammunition, or a deadly weapon from the scene if the law enforcement
officer has:
(1) probable cause to believe that a crime involving domestic or
family violence has occurred;
(2) a reasonable belief that the firearm, ammunition, or deadly
weapon:
(A) exposes the victim to an immediate risk of serious bodily
injury; or
(B) was an instrumentality of the crime involving domestic or
family violence; and
(3) observed the firearm, ammunition, or deadly weapon at the
scene during the response.
(c) If a firearm, ammunition, or a deadly weapon is removed from
the scene under subsection (b), the law enforcement officer shall
provide for the safe storage of the firearm, ammunition, or deadly
weapon during the pendency of a proceeding related to the alleged act
of domestic or family violence.
2026 IN 1310—LS 6959/DI 151